fr: Spectre lumineux: Spectre lumineux réglable; Lumière bleue; Spectre complet; Lumière verte; Lumière infrarouge; Multi-spectrum; Lumière proche infrarouge (NIR); Lumière rouge; lumière UV; lumière blanche; Autre
pl: Widmo światła: Regulowane widmo światła; Światło niebieskie; Pełne widmo; Zielone światło; Podczerwień; Wielospektrum; Światło bliskiej podczerwieni (NIR); Światło czerwone; Światło UV; Światło białe; Inne
zh-CN: 光谱: 可调光谱; 蓝光; 全光谱; 绿光; 红外光; 多光谱; 近红外光 (NIR); 红光; UV 光; 白光; 其他
pt-PT: Espectro de luz: Espetro de luz ajustável; Luz azul; Espetro total; Luz verde; Luz infravermelha; Multiespetro; Luz infravermelha próxima (NIR); Luz vermelha; Luz UV; Luz branca; Outro
da: Lysspektrum: Justerbart lysspektrum; Blåt lys; Fuldt spektrum; Grønt lys; Infrarødt lys; Multi-spektrum; Nær-infrarødt lys (NIR); Rødt lys; UV-lys; Hvidt lys; Andet
sv: Ljusspektrum: Justerbart ljusspektrum; Blått ljus; Fullt spektrum; Grönt ljus; Infrarött ljus; Multispektrum; Nära infrarött ljus (NIR); Rött ljus; UV-ljus; Vitt ljus; Övrigt
cs: Světelné spektrum: Nastavitelné světelné spektrum; Modré světlo; Celé spektrum; Zelené světlo; Infračervené světlo; Multispektrální; Blízké infračervené světlo (NIR); Červené světlo; UV světlo; Bílé světlo; Jiné
es: Espectro de luz: Espectro luminoso regulable; Luz azul; Espectro completo; Luz verde; Luz infrarroja; Multiespectro; Luz infrarroja cercana (NIR); Luz roja; Luz ultravioleta; Luz blanca; Otros
it: Spettro luminoso: Spettro luminoso regolabile; Luce blu; Spettro completo; Luce verde; Luce infrarossa; Multispettro; Near-infrared light (NIR); Luce rossa; Luce UV; Luce bianca; Altro
ko: 광 스펙트럼: 조절식 광 스펙트럼; 청색광; 전체 스펙트럼; 녹색광; 적외선; 다중 스펙트럼; 근적외선(NIR); 적색광; 자외선; 백색광; 기타
sl-SI: Svetlobni spekter: Nastavljiv spekter svetlobe; Modra svetloba; Celoten spekter; Zelena svetloba; Infrardeča svetloba; Večspektralna; Bližnja infrardeča svetloba (NIR); Rdeča svetloba; UV svetloba; Bela svetloba; Drugo
nb: Lysspektrum: Justerbart lysspektrum; Blålys; Fullt spektrum; Grønt lys; Infrarødt lys; Multispektrum; Nær-infrarødt lys (NIR); Rødt lys; UV-lys; Hvitt lys; Annet
zh-TW: 光譜: 可調節光譜; 藍光; 全光譜; 綠光; 紅外線; 多光譜; 近紅外光 (NIR); 紅光; 紫外光; 白光; 其他
th: สเปกตรัมของแสง: สเปกตรัมแสงแบบปรับได้; แสงสีฟ้า; สเปกตรัมเต็มรูปแบบ; แสงสีเขียว; แสงอินฟราเรด; หลายสเปกตรัม; แสงเนียร์อินฟราเรด (NIR); แสงสีแดง; แสง UV; แสงสีขาว; อื่นๆ
ru: Спектр света: Регулируемый спектр света; Синий свет; Полный спектр; Зеленый свет; Инфракрасный свет; Мультиспектральный; Ближний инфракрасный свет (БИК); Красный свет; Ультрафиолетовый свет; Белый свет; Другое
en: Light spectrum: Adjustable light spectrum; Blue light; Full spectrum; Green light; Infrared light; Multi-spectrum; Near-infrared light (NIR); Red light; UV light; White light; Other
ja: 光のスペクトル: 調整可能な光スペクトル; 青色光; フルスペクトル; 緑色光; 赤外線; マルチスペクトル; 近赤外線 (NIR); 赤色光; 紫外線; 白色光; その他
fi: Valospektri: Säädettävä valospektri; Sinivalo; Täysi spektri; Vihervalo; Infrapunavalo; Monispektri; Lähi-infrapunavalo; Punavalo; UV-valo; Valkovalo; Muu
ro-RO: Spectru de lumină: Spectru de lumină reglabil; Lumină albastră; Spectru complet; Lumină verde; Lumină infraroșie; Multi-spectru; Lumină în infraroșu apropiat (NIR); Lumină roșie; Lumină UV; Lumină albă; Altele
lt-LT: Šviesos spektras: Reguliuojamas šviesos spektras; Mėlyna šviesa; Visas spektras; Žalia šviesa; Infraraudonieji spinduliai; Daugiaspektrė; Artima infraraudoniesiems spinduliams šviesa (NIR); Raudona šviesa; UV šviesa; Balta šviesa; Kita
hr-HR: Svjetlosni spektar: Podesivi svjetlosni spektar; Plavo svjetlo; Puni spektar; Zeleno svjetlo; Infracrveno svjetlo; Višestruki spektar; Blisko infracrveno svjetlo (NIR); Crveno svjetlo; UV svjetlo; Bijelo svjetlo; Ostalo
tr: Işık Spektrumu: Ayarlanabilir ışık spektrumu; Mavi ışık; Tam spektrum; Yeşil ışık; Kızılötesi ışık; Çoklu spektrum; Yakın kızılötesi ışık (NIR); Kırmızı ışık; UV ışık; Beyaz ışık; Diğer
nl: Lichtspectrum: Instelbaar lichtspectrum; Blauw licht; Volledig spectrum; Groen licht; Infrarood licht; Multi-spectrum; Nabij-infrarood licht (NIR); Rood licht; UV-licht; Wit licht; Andere
de: Lichtspektrum: Einstellbares Lichtspektrum; Blaulicht; Vollständiges Spektrum; Grünlicht; Infrarotlicht; Multispektrum; Nahinfrarotlicht (NIR); Rotlicht; UV-Licht; Weißlicht; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Svetelné spektrum: Nastaviteľné svetelné spektrum; Modré svetlo; Celé spektrum; Zelené svetlo; Infračervené svetlo; Multispektrálny; Blízke infračervené svetlo (NIR); Červené svetlo; UV svetlo; Biele svetlo; Iné
bg-BG: Светлинен спектър: Регулируем светлинен спектър; Синя светлина; Пълен спектър; Зелена светлина; Инфрачервена светлина; Мултиспектърна; Близка инфрачервена светлина (NIR); Червена светлина; UV светлина; Бяла светлина; Други
vi: Quang phổ ánh sáng: Quang phổ ánh sáng có thể điều chỉnh; Ánh sáng xanh dương; Toàn phổ; Ánh sáng xanh lục; Đèn hồng ngoại; Đa phổ; Ánh sáng cận hồng ngoại (NIR); Ánh sáng đỏ; Ánh sáng tia cực tím; Ánh sáng trắng; Khác
el: Φάσμα φωτός: Ρυθμιζόμενο φάσμα φωτός; Μπλε φως; Πλήρες φάσμα; Πράσινο φως; Υπέρυθρο φως; Πολλαπλού φάσματος; Εγγύς υπέρυθρο φως (NIR); Κόκκινο φως; UV φως; Λευκό φως; Άλλο
hu: Fényspektrum: Állítható fényspektrum; Kék fény; Teljes spektrum; Zöld fény; Infravörös fény; Többspektrumú; Közeli infravörös fény (NIR); Vörös fény; UV-fény; Fehér fény; Egyéb
pt-BR: Espectro de Luz: Espectro de luz ajustável; Luz azul; Espectro completo; Luz verde; Luz infravermelha; Multiespectro; Luz infravermelha próxima (NIR); Luz vermelha; Luz UV; Luz branca; Outro